Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201581-12,157
Planning grants; phase one program; limitations.

(1) The department shall establish a phase one program to provide grants to small businesses that qualify under the federal grant program for the purposes of planning for an application under the federal grant program. If a small business receives funding under the federal grant program, the department or a nonprofit entity designated by the department may make grants to match up to sixty-five percent of the amount of the federal grant.

(2) Planning grants under subsection (1) of this section shall not exceed five thousand dollars per project. Federal award matching grants under this section shall not exceed one hundred thousand dollars. No business shall receive funding for more than one project every two years.

(3) The department may award up to four million dollars per year for grants under this section.

Laws 2011, LB387, § 6;

Laws 2015, LB449, § 2.
August 30, 2015December 1, 2021